California statutes. Probate Code
 death is subject to the claims and expenses to the same extent that it would be subject to the claims and expenses if the property had been owned by the powerholder.

(c) This section applies whether or not the power of appointment has been exercised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 25.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

683.

Property subject to a general power of appointment created by the donor in the donor’s favor, whether or not presently exercisable, is subject to the claims of the donor’s creditors
 or the donor’s estate and to the expenses of the administration of the donor’s estate, except to the extent the donor effectively irrevocably appointed the property subject to the general power of appointment in favor of a person other than the
 donor or the donor’s estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 26.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

684.

For the purposes of Sections 682 and 683, a person to whom the powerholder owes an obligation of support shall be considered a creditor of the powerholder to the extent that a legal obligation exists for the powerholder to
 provide the support.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 27.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Rule Against Perpetuities [690. - 690.]

690.

The statutory rule against perpetuities provided by Part 2 (commencing with Section 21200) of Division 11 applies to powers of appointment governed by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 30, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Revocability of Creation, Exercise, or Release of Power of Appointment [695. - 695.]

695.

(a) Unless the power to revoke is in the creating instrument or exists pursuant to Section 15400, the creation of a power of appointment is irrevocable.

(b) Unless made expressly irrevocable by the creating instrument or the instrument of exercise, an exercise of a power of appointment is revocable if the power to revoke exists pursuant to Section 15400 or so long as the interest in the appointive property, whether present or future, has not been transferred or become
 distributable pursuant to the appointment.

(c) Unless the power to revoke is reserved in the instrument releasing the power, a release of a power of appointment is irrevocable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 30, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 15. DEPOSIT OF ESTATE PLANNING DOCUMENTS WITH ATTORNEY [700. - 735.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [700. - 704.]

700.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

701.

“Attorney” means an individual licensed to practice law in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

702.

“Deposit” means delivery of a document by a depositor to an attorney for safekeeping or authorization by a depositor for an attorney to retain a document for safekeeping.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

703.

“Depositor” means a natural person who deposits the person’s document with an attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

704.

“Document” means any of the following:

(a) A signed original will, declaration of trust, trust amendment, or other document modifying a will or trust.

(b) A signed original power of attorney.

(c) A signed original nomination of conservator.

(d) Any other signed original instrument that the attorney and
 depositor agree in writing to make subject to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Duties and Liabilities of Attorney [710. - 716.]

710.

If a document is deposited with an attorney, the attorney, and a successor attorney that accepts transfer of the document, shall use ordinary care for preservation of the document on and after July 1, 1994, whether or not consideration is given, and shall hold the document in a safe, vault, safe deposit box, or other secure place where it will be reasonably protected against loss or destruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

711.

If a document deposited with an attorney is lost or destroyed, the attorney shall give notice of the loss or destruction to the depositor by one of the following methods:

(a) By delivering pursuant to Section 1215 the notice to the depositor’s last known address.

(b) By the method most likely to give the depositor actual notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 9.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

712.

Notwithstanding failure of an attorney to satisfy the standard of care required by Section 710 or 716, the attorney is not liable for loss or destruction of the document if the depositor has actual notice of the loss or destruction and a reasonable opportunity to replace the document, and the attorney offers without charge either to assist the depositor in replacing the document, or to prepare a substantially similar document and assist in its execution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

713.

The acceptance by an attorney of a document for deposit imposes no duty on the attorney to do either of the following:

(a) Inquire into the content, validity, invalidity, or completeness of the document, or the correctness of any information in the document.

(b) Provide continuing legal services to the depositor or to any beneficiary under the document. This subdivision does not affect the duty, if any, of the drafter of the document to
 provide continuing legal services to any person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

714.

(a) If so provided in a written agreement signed by the depositor, an attorney may charge the depositor for compensation and expenses incurred in safekeeping or delivery of a document deposited with the attorney.

(b) No lien arises for the benefit of an attorney on a document deposited with the attorney, whether before or after its transfer, even if provided by agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

715.

An attorney may give written notice to a depositor, and obtain written acknowledgment from the depositor, in the following form:

NOTICE AND ACKNOWLEDGMENTTo:(Name of depositor)(Address)(City, state, and ZIP)(Electronic address)I have accepted your will or other estate planning document for safekeeping. I must use ordinary care for preservation of the document.

You must keep me advised of any change in your addresses shown above. If you do not and I cannot return this document to you when necessary, I will no longer be required to use ordinary care for preservation of the document, and I may transfer it to another attorney, or I may transfer it to the clerk of the superior court of the county of your last known domicile, and give notice of the transfer to the State Bar of California.(Signature of attorney)(Address of attorney)(City, state, and ZIP)(Electronic address)My addresses shown above are correct. I understand that I must keep you advised of any change in these addresses.Dated: (Signature of depositor)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 10.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

716.

Notwithstanding Section 710, if an attorney has given written notice to the depositor, and has obtained written acknowledgment from the depositor, in substantially the form provided in Section 715, and the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 732 are satisfied, the attorney, and a successor attorney that accepts transfer of a document, shall use at least slight care for preservation of a document deposited with the attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Termination of Deposit [720. - 735.]



  ARTICLE 1. Termination by Depositor [720. - 720.]

720.

A depositor may terminate a deposit on demand, in which case the attorney shall deliver the document to the depositor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Termination by Attorney [730. - 735.]

730.

An attorney with whom a document has been deposited, or to whom a document has been transferred pursuant to this article, may terminate the deposit only as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

731.

An attorney may terminate the deposit by one of the following methods:

(a) Personal delivery of the document to the depositor.

(b) Mailing the document to the depositor’s last known address, by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested, and receiving a signed receipt.

(c) The method agreed on by the depositor and attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

732.

(a) An attorney may terminate a deposit under this section if the attorney has delivered notice pursuant to Section 1215 to reclaim the document to the depositor’s last known address and the depositor has failed to reclaim the document within 90 days after delivery.

(b) Subject to subdivision (f), an attorney may terminate a deposit under this section by transferring the document to another attorney. All documents transferred under this subdivision shall be transferred to the same attorney.

(c) Subject to subdivision (f), if an attorney is deceased, lacks legal capacity, or is no longer an
 active member of the State Bar, a deposit may be terminated under this section by transferring the document to the clerk of the superior court of the county of the depositor’s last known domicile. The attorney shall advise the clerk that the document is being transferred pursuant to this section.

(d) An attorney may not accept a fee or compensation from a transferee for transferring a document under this section. An attorney may charge a fee for receiving a document under this section.

(e) Transfer of a document by an attorney under this section is not a waiver or breach of any privilege or confidentiality associated with the document, and is not a violation of the rules of professional conduct. If the document is privileged under Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of
 Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, the document remains privileged after the transfer.

(f) If the document is a will and the attorney has actual notice that the depositor has died, the attorney may terminate a deposit only as provided in Section 734.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 11.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

733.

(a) An attorney transferring one or more documents under Section 732 shall deliver notice pursuant to Section 1215 of the transfer to the State Bar of California. The notice shall contain all of the following information:

(1) The name of the depositor.

(2) The date of the transfer.

(3) The name, address, and State Bar number of the transferring attorney.

(4) Whether any documents are transferred to an attorney, and the name, address, and State Bar number of the
 attorney to whom the documents are transferred.

(5) Whether any documents are transferred to a superior court clerk.

(b) The State Bar shall record only one notice of transfer for each transferring attorney. The State Bar shall prescribe the form for the notice of transfer. On request by any person, the State Bar shall give that person information in the notice of transfer. At its sole election, the State Bar may give the information orally or in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 12.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

734.

(a) In cases not governed by subdivision (b) or (c), after the death of the depositor an attorney may terminate a deposit by personal delivery of the document to the depositor’s personal representative.

(b) If the document is a will and the attorney has actual notice that the depositor has died but does not have actual notice that a personal representative has been appointed for the depositor, an attorney may terminate a deposit only as provided in Section 8200.

(c) If the document is a trust, after the death of the depositor an attorney may terminate a deposit by personal delivery of the document either to the depositor’s personal representative or to the trustee named in the document.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

735.

(a) If the attorney is deceased or lacks legal capacity, a deposit may be terminated as provided in this article by the attorney’s law partner, by a shareholder of the attorney’s law corporation, or by a lawyer or nonlawyer employee of the attorney’s firm, partnership, or corporation.

(b) If the attorney lacks legal capacity and there is no person to act under subdivision (a), a deposit may be terminated by the conservator of the attorney’s estate or by an attorney in fact
 acting under a durable power of attorney. A conservator of the attorney’s estate may act without court approval.

(c) If the attorney is deceased and there is no person to act under subdivision (a), a deposit may be terminated by the attorney’s personal representative.

(d) If a person authorized under this section terminates a deposit as provided in Section 732, the person shall give the notice required by Section 733.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 16. JURISDICTION [800. - 801.]

800.

The court in proceedings under this code is a court of general jurisdiction and the court, or a judge of the court, has the same power and authority with respect to the proceedings as otherwise provided by law for a superior court, or a judge of the superior court, including, but not limited to, the matters authorized by Section 128 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 806, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

801.

The court, on its own motion or on the motion of any interested party, may order that an action or proceeding not specifically provided in this code be determined in a separate civil action. Upon the payment of the appropriate filing fees, the court may order transfer of the severed action or proceeding to the separate civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 862, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 17. LEGAL MENTAL CAPACITY [810. - 813.]

810.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) For purposes of this part, there shall exist a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of proof that all persons have the capacity to make decisions and to be responsible for their acts or decisions.

(b) A person who has a mental or physical disorder may still be capable of contracting, conveying, marrying, making medical decisions, executing wills or trusts, and performing other
 actions.

(c) A judicial determination that a person is totally without understanding, or is of unsound mind, or suffers from one or more mental deficits so substantial that, under the circumstances, the person should be deemed to lack the legal capacity to perform a specific act, should be based on evidence of a deficit in one or more of the person’s mental functions rather than on a diagnosis of a person’s mental or physical disorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 581, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

811.

(a) A determination that a person is of unsound mind or lacks the capacity to make a decision or do a certain act, including, but not limited to, the incapacity to contract, to make a conveyance, to marry, to make medical decisions, to execute wills, or to execute trusts, shall be supported by evidence of a deficit in at least one of the following mental functions, subject to subdivision (b), and evidence of a correlation between the deficit or deficits and the decision or acts in question:

(1) Alertness and attention, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Level of arousal or consciousness.

(B) Orientation to time, place, person, and situation.

(C) Ability to attend and concentrate.

(2) Information processing, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Short- and long-term memory, including immediate recall.

(B) Ability to understand or communicate with others, either verbally or otherwise.

(C) Recognition of familiar objects and familiar persons.

(D) Ability to understand and appreciate quantities.

(E) Ability to reason using abstract concepts.

(F) Ability to plan, organize, and carry out actions in one’s own rational self-interest.

(G) Ability to reason logically.

(3) Thought processes. Deficits in these functions may be demonstrated by the presence of the following:

(A) Severely disorganized thinking.

(B) Hallucinations.

(C) Delusions.

(D) Uncontrollable, repetitive, or intrusive thoughts.

(4) Ability to modulate mood and affect. Deficits in this ability may be demonstrated by the presence of a pervasive and persistent or recurrent state of euphoria, anger, anxiety, fear, panic, depression, hopelessness or despair, helplessness, apathy or indifference, that is inappropriate in degree to the individual’s circumstances.

(b) A deficit in the mental functions listed above may be considered only if the deficit, by itself or in combination with one or more other mental function deficits, significantly impairs the person’s ability to understand and appreciate the consequences of his or her actions with regard to the type of act or decision in question.

(c) In determining whether a person suffers from a deficit in mental function so substantial that the person lacks the capacity to do a certain act, the court may
 take into consideration the frequency, severity, and duration of periods of impairment.

(d) The mere diagnosis of a mental or physical disorder shall not be sufficient in and of itself to support a determination that a person is of unsound mind or lacks the capacity to do a certain act.

(e) This part applies only to the evidence that is presented to, and the findings that are made by, a court determining the capacity of a person to do a certain act or make a decision, including, but not limited to, making medical decisions. Nothing in this part shall affect the decisionmaking process set forth in Section 1418.8 of the Health and Safety Code, nor increase or decrease the burdens of documentation on, or potential liability of, health care providers who, outside the judicial context, determine the capacity of patients to make a medical decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 581, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

812.

Except where otherwise provided by law, including, but not limited to, Section 813 and the statutory and decisional law of testamentary capacity, a person lacks the capacity to make a decision unless the person has the ability to communicate verbally, or by any other means, the decision, and to understand and appreciate, to the extent relevant, all of the following:

(a) The rights, duties, and responsibilities created by, or affected by the decision.

(b) The probable consequences for the decisionmaker and, where appropriate, the persons affected by the decision.

(c) The significant risks, benefits, and reasonable alternatives involved in the decision.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 178, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

813.

(a) For purposes of a judicial determination, a person has the capacity to give informed consent to a proposed medical treatment if the person is able to do all of the following:

(1) Respond knowingly and intelligently to queries about that medical treatment.

(2) Participate in that treatment decision by means of a rational thought process.

(3) Understand all of the following items of minimum basic medical treatment information with respect to that treatment:

(A) The nature and seriousness of the illness, disorder, or defect that the person has.

(B) The nature of the medical treatment that is being recommended by the person’s health care providers.

(C) The probable degree and duration of any benefits and risks of any medical intervention that is being recommended by the person’s health care providers, and the consequences of lack of treatment.

(D) The nature, risks, and benefits of any reasonable alternatives.

(b) A person who has the capacity to give informed consent to a proposed medical treatment also has the
 capacity to refuse consent to that treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 178, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 18. RIGHT TO TRIAL [825. - 825.]

825.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this code, there is no right to a jury trial in proceedings under this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 175, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 19. CONVEYANCE OR TRANSFER OF PROPERTY CLAIMED TO BELONG TO DECEDENT OR OTHER PERSON [850. - 859.]

850.

(a) The following persons may file a petition requesting that the court make an order under this part:

(1) A guardian, conservator, or any claimant, in the following cases:

(A) Where the conservatee is bound by a contract in writing to convey real property or to transfer personal property, executed by the conservatee while competent or executed by the conservatee’s predecessor in interest, and the contract is one that
 can be specifically enforced.

(B) Where the minor has succeeded to the interest of a person bound by a contract in writing to convey real property or to transfer personal property, and the contract is one that can be specifically enforced.

(C) Where the guardian or conservator or the minor or conservatee is in possession of, or holds title to, real or personal property, and the property or some interest therein is claimed to belong to another.

(D) Where the minor or conservatee has a claim to real or personal property title to or possession of which is held by another.

(2) The personal representative or any interested person in any of the following cases:

(A) Where the decedent while
 living is bound by a contract in writing to convey real property or to transfer personal property and dies before making the conveyance or transfer and the decedent, if living, could have been compelled to make the conveyance or transfer.

(B) Where the decedent while living binds himself or herself or his or her personal representative by a contract in writing to convey real property or to transfer personal property upon or after his or her death and the contract is one which can be specifically enforced.

(C)Where the decedent died in possession of, or holding title to, real or personal property, and the property or some interest therein is claimed to belong to another.

(D) Where the decedent died having a claim to real or personal property, title to or possession of which is held by another.

(3) The trustee or any interested person in any of the following cases:

(A) Where the trustee is in possession of, or holds title to, real or personal property, and the property, or some interest, is claimed to belong to another.

(B) Where the trustee has a claim to real or personal property, title to or possession of which is held by another.

(C) Where the property of the trust is claimed to be subject to a creditor of the settlor of the trust.

(b) The petition shall set forth facts upon which the claim is based.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

851.

(a) At least 30 days prior to the day of the hearing, the petitioner shall cause notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition to be served in the manner provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure on all of the following persons where applicable:

(1) The personal representative, conservator, guardian, or trustee as appropriate.

(2) Each person claiming an interest in, or having title to or possession of, the property.

(b) Except for those persons given notice pursuant to
 subdivision (a), notice of the hearing, together with a copy of the petition, shall be given as provided in Section 1220 if the matter concerns a decedent estate, as provided in Section 1460 if the matter concerns a conservatorship or guardianship, or as provided in Section 17203 if the matter concerns a trust to all of the following persons:

(1) Each person listed in Section 1220 along with any heir or devisee whose interest in the property may be affected by the petition if the matter concerns a decedent estate.

(2) Each person listed in Section 1460 if the matter concerns a conservatorship or guardianship.

(3) Each person listed in Section 17203 if the matter concerns a trust.

(c) A notice of hearing shall contain all of the following:

(1) A description of the subject property sufficient to provide adequate notice to any party who may have an interest in the property. For real property, the notice shall state the street address or, if none, a description of the property’s location and assessor’s parcel number.

(2) If the petition seeks relief pursuant to Section 859, a description of the relief sought sufficient to provide adequate notice to the party against whom that relief is requested.

(3) A statement advising any person interested in the property that he or she may file a response to the petition.

(d) The court may not
 shorten the time for giving the notice of hearing under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 32, Sec. 1.   (AB 308)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

851.1.

A petitioner in a proceeding under Section 850 may commence discovery upon any person who receives notice of the hearing pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 851 in accordance with the same time periods set forth in the Civil Discovery Act (Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure), except that the time periods shall commence to run upon service of the petition and notice of hearing. Nothing in this section shall alter when a respondent in such a proceeding may commence discovery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 32, Sec. 2.   (AB 308)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

852.

An interested person may request time for filing a response to the petition for discovery proceedings, or for other preparation for the hearing, and the court shall grant a continuance for a reasonable time for any of these purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

853.

A person having or claiming title to or an interest in the property which is the subject of the petition may, at or prior to the hearing, object to the hearing of the petition if the petition is filed in a court which is not the proper court under any other provision of law for the trial of a civil action seeking the same relief and, if the objection is established, the court shall not grant the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

854.

If a civil action is pending with respect to the subject matter of a petition filed pursuant to this chapter this part and jurisdiction has been obtained in the court where the civil action is pending prior to the filing of the petition, upon request of any party to the civil action, the court shall abate the petition until the conclusion of the civil action. This section shall not apply if the court finds that the civil action was filed for the purpose of delay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 166.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

855.

An action brought under this part may include claims, causes of action, or matters that are normally raised in a civil action to the extent that the matters are related factually to the subject matter of a petition filed under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

856.

Except as provided in Sections 853 and 854, if the court is satisfied that a conveyance, transfer, or other order should be made, the court shall make an order authorizing and directing the personal representative or other fiduciary, or the person having title to or possession of the property, to execute a conveyance or transfer to the person entitled thereto, or granting other appropriate relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

856.5.

The court may not grant a petition under this chapter if the court determines that the matter should be determined by a civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 417, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

857.

(a) The order is prima facie evidence of the correctness of the proceedings and of the authority of the personal representative or other fiduciary or other person to make the conveyance or transfer.

(b) After entry of an order that the personal representative, other fiduciary, or other person execute a conveyance or transfer, the person entitled thereunder has the right to the possession of the property, and the right to hold the property, according to the terms of the order as if
 the property had been conveyed or transferred in accordance with the terms of the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

858.

If a proceeding has been brought under this part by a conservator on behalf of a conservatee, or by a guardian on behalf of a minor, and the conservatee or minor dies during the pendency of the proceeding, the personal representative of the conservatee or minor’s estate or other successor in interest may proceed with the matter and the existing proceeding shall not be dismissed on account of the death of the conservatee or minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 278.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

859.

If a court finds that a person has in bad faith wrongfully taken, concealed, or disposed of property belonging to a conservatee, a minor, an elder, a dependent adult, a trust, or the estate of a decedent, or has taken, concealed, or disposed of the property by the use of undue influence in bad faith or through the commission of elder or dependent adult financial abuse, as defined in Section 15610.30 of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code, the person shall be liable for twice the value of the property recovered by an action under this part. In addition, except as otherwise required by law, including Section 15657.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the person may, in the court’s discretion, be liable for reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. The remedies provided in this section shall be in addition to any other remedies available in law to a person authorized to bring an action pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 99, Sec. 1.   (AB 381)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 20. Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act [870. - 884.]

870.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   (AB 691)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

871.

As used in this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Account” means an arrangement under a terms-of-service agreement in which the custodian carries, maintains, processes, receives, or stores a digital asset of the user or provides goods or services to the user.

(b) “Carries” means engages in the transmission of electronic communications.

(c) “Catalogue of electronic communications” means information that identifies each person with which a user has had an electronic communication, the time and date of the communication, and the electronic address of the
 person.

(d) “Content of an electronic communication” means information concerning the substance or meaning of the communication, which meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Has been sent or received by a user.

(2) Is in electronic storage by a custodian providing an electronic communication service to the public or is carried or maintained by a custodian providing a remote-computing service to the public.

(3) Is not readily accessible to the public.

(e) (1) “Court” means the superior court presiding over the judicial proceedings that have been initiated under this code to
 administer the estate of the deceased user or, if none, the superior court sitting in the exercise of jurisdiction under this code in the county of the user’s domicile.

(2) The court, as defined in this section, shall have exclusive jurisdiction over proceedings brought under this part.

(f) “Custodian” means a person who carries, maintains, processes, receives, or stores a digital asset of a user.

(g) “Designated recipient” means a person chosen by a user using an online tool to administer digital assets of the user.

(h) (1) “Digital asset” means an electronic record in which an individual has a right or interest.

(2) The term “digital asset” does not include an underlying asset or liability unless the asset or liability is itself an electronic record.

(i) “Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

(j) “Electronic communication” has the same meaning as the definition in Section 2510(12) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(k) “Electronic communication service” means a custodian who provides to a user the ability to send or receive an electronic communication.

(l) “Fiduciary” means an original, additional, or
 successor personal representative, conservator, agent, or trustee.

(m) “Information” means data, text, images, videos, sounds, codes, computer programs, software, databases, or other items with like characteristics.

(n) “Online tool” means an electronic service provided by a custodian that allows the user, in an agreement distinct from the terms-of-service agreement between the custodian and user, to provide directions for disclosure or nondisclosure of digital assets to a third person.

(o) “Person” means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity.

(p) “Personal representative” means an executor, administrator, special administrator, or person who performs substantially the same function under any other law.

(q) “Power of attorney” means a record that grants an agent authority to act in the place of the principal.

(r) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in a perceivable form.

(s) “Remote-computing service” means a custodian who provides to a user computer processing services or the storage of digital assets by means of an electronic communications system as defined in Section 2510(14) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(t) “Terms-of-service agreement” means an agreement that controls the relationship between a user and a custodian.

(u) (1) “Trustee” means a fiduciary with legal title to property under an agreement or declaration that creates a beneficial interest in another.

(2) The term “trustee” includes a successor trustee.

(v) “User” means a person who has an account with a custodian.

(w) “Will” includes a codicil, a testamentary instrument that only appoints an executor, or an instrument that revokes or revises a testamentary instrument.

(x) “Agent” means an attorney-in-fact granted authority over financial matters under a durable or nondurable power of attorney.

(y) (1) “Conservator” means a person appointed by a court to manage the estate of a living individual.

(2) The term “conservator” includes a limited conservator.

(z) “Conservatee” means an individual for whom a conservator has been appointed.

(aa) “Principal” means an individual who grants authority to an agent in a power of attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 799, Sec. 1.   (SB 1458)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

872.

(a) This part shall apply to all of the following:

(1) A fiduciary acting under a will executed before, on, or after January 1, 2017.

(2) A personal representative acting for a decedent who died before, on, or after January 1, 2017.

(3) A trustee acting under a trust created before, on, or after January 1, 2017.

(4) A custodian of digital assets for a user if the user resides in this state or resided in this state at the time of the user’s death.

(5) A conservator appointed before, on, or after January 1, 2025.

(6) A fiduciary acting under a power of attorney executed before, on, or after January 1, 2025.

(b) This part does not apply to a digital asset of an employer used by an employee in the ordinary course of the employer’s business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   (SB 1458)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

873.

(a) A user may use an online tool to direct the custodian to disclose to a designated recipient or not disclose some or all of the user’s digital assets, including the content of electronic communications. If the online tool allows the user to modify or delete a direction at all times, a direction regarding disclosure using an online tool overrides a contrary direction by the user in a will, trust, power of attorney, or other record.

(b) If a user has not used an online tool to give direction under subdivision (a) or if a custodian has not provided an online tool, a user may allow or prohibit in a will, trust, power of attorney, or other record the disclosure to a fiduciary
 of some or all of the user’s digital assets, including the contents of electronic communications sent or received by the user.

(c) A user’s direction under subdivision (a) or (b) overrides a contrary provision in a terms-of-service agreement.
